District of Columbia statutes.
48-843.03

Establishment of the Pharmaceutical Education Program.

(a)

There is established an evidence-based Pharmaceutical Education Program (“Program”) within the Department of Health. The Program shall:

(1)

Educate prescribers who participate in the District of Columbia Medicaid program, and other publicly funded, contracted, or subsidized health-care programs, on the therapeutic and cost-effective utilization of pharmaceutical products;

(2)

Inform prescribers about pharmaceutical product marketing practices that are intended to circumvent competition from generic, other therapeutically-equivalent alternatives, or other evidence-based treatment options; and

(3)

Utilize, or incorporate into the Program, other independent educational resources or models proven effective in promoting high-quality, evidenced-based, cost-effective information regarding the effectiveness and safety of pharmaceutical products.

(b)

The Program shall be made available to prescribers who do not participate in the District of Columbia Medicaid program or other publicly funded, contracted, or subsidized health-care programs on a subscription basis.

(c)

If approved by the Board of Medicine, the PE program may be used to satisfy continuing education requirements for the practice of medicine.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 403, 55 DCR 1659
This section is referenced in § 48-844.03.